Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
Civil Actions Brought by Inmates

454.400.
Definitions for KRS 454.405 to 454.415.

As used in KRS

454.405

to

454.415

, “inmate” means any person confined in either a state or federally operated facility, a county jail or other facility of local government, or in a private facility under contract with the Department of Corrections.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 118, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 46, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

454.405.
Dismissal of civil actions brought by inmates — Grounds — Order — Assessment of fines and costs.

At any time, and upon its own motion or on motion of a party, a court may dismiss a civil action brought by an inmate or on behalf of an inmate if satisfied that the action is malicious or harassing or if satisfied that the action is legally without merit or factually frivolous. In addition to any other available disposition, a court may dismiss the civil action if satisfied that the affidavit of poverty in support of a request to proceed in forma pauperis is wholly or partly false or misleading.

This section does not apply to criminal or collateral criminal proceedings.

A court which dismisses a civil action brought by an inmate for any of the reasons set out in subsection (1) of this section shall include as part of its order specific findings as to the reasons for the dismissal. The court shall, upon issuing the order, direct the circuit clerk to transmit a copy of the entire court order to the official having custody of the inmate and to all persons named as a party defendant in the action.

A court which dismisses a civil action brought by an inmate for any of the reasons set out in subsection (1) of this section may include as part of its order an assessment of fines and costs against the inmate as the court may deem reasonable and prudent. The Department of Corrections, county jail, or other local or regional correctional facility may enforce this assessment against the inmate’s canteen account and against any other assets of the inmate through any other mechanism provided by law.

No inmate may maintain a civil action for monetary damages in any state court for mental or emotional injury without a prior showing of physical injury.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 118, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 345, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 46, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.

454.410.
Payment of fees and court costs by inmates — Waiver.

When an inmate commences, intervenes, or becomes a party to an action or an appeal of a judgment in a civil action or proceeding without paying the fees and court costs imposed by law, the inmate shall prepare an affidavit with a certified copy of the inmate’s prison account statement showing the total deposits for the six (6) months immediately preceding the inmate’s commencement, intervention, or joining of the action, or an appeal of a judgment in a civil action or proceeding, if available. If the records are not available for the preceding six (6) months, all inmate account records that are available shall be filed with the affidavit.

When an inmate commences, intervenes, or joins an action or an appeal of a judgment in a civil action or proceeding, the inmate shall pay at least partial court fees and costs. At a minimum, the inmate shall pay a five dollar ($5) filing fee unless the court determines the inmate is unable to pay a fee and waives all fees and costs. If the inmate has the ability to pay a higher amount, the court shall order the inmate to pay the higher amount. However, the fees and costs imposed shall not exceed the full amount otherwise imposed by law.

If the court approves the application to waive all fees and costs, the court shall give written notice to the inmate that all fees and costs relating to the action will be waived. If the court denies the motion to waive all fees, the court shall give written notice to the inmate that the inmate’s case will be dismissed if the partial fees and costs are not paid within forty-five (45) days after the date of the order, or within an additional period that the court may, upon request, allow. Process concerning the inmate’s case shall not be served until the filing fee and the fee relating to service of process is paid.

If the inmate claims exceptional circumstances that render the inmate unable to pay at least the partial fees and costs ordered by the court, then the inmate shall submit, in addition to the statement of account required by this section, a copy of the detailed canteen expenditure sheet, and an affidavit of special circumstances setting forth the reasons and circumstances that justify relief from the partial fees and costs requirement.

In no event shall an inmate bring a civil action or appeal a judgment in a civil action or proceeding under this section if the inmate has, on three (3) or more occasions within a five (5) year period, while incarcerated or detained in any facility, brought an action or appeal in any court that was dismissed on the grounds that it was frivolous, malicious, or harassing, unless the prisoner is under imminent danger of serious physical injury, without paying the entire filing fee in full.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 118, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 11, § 4, effective July 15, 2002.

454.415.
Prohibition against civil action filed by or on behalf of inmate prior to exhaustion of administrative remedies — Dismissal of action and assessment of costs — Period of limitations.

No action shall be brought by or on behalf of an inmate, with respect to:

An inmate disciplinary proceeding;

Challenges to a sentence calculation;

Challenges to custody credit; or

A conditions-of-confinement issue;

until administrative remedies as set forth in the policies and procedures of the Department of Corrections, county jail, or other local or regional correctional facility are exhausted.

Administrative remedies shall be exhausted even if the remedy the inmate seeks is unavailable.

The inmate shall attach to any complaint filed documents verifying that administrative remedies have been exhausted.

A court shall dismiss a civil action brought by an inmate for any of the reasons set out in subsection (1) of this section if the inmate has not exhausted administrative remedies, and may include as part of its order an assessment of court costs against the inmate as the court may deem reasonable and prudent. The correctional facility may enforce this assessment against the inmate’s canteen account and against any other assets of the inmate through any other mechanism provided by law.

A court which dismisses a civil action brought by an inmate for the reasons set out in this section shall include as part of its order specific findings as to the reasons for the dismissal. The court shall, upon issuing the order, direct the circuit clerk to transmit a copy of the entire court order to the official having custody of the inmate, to all persons named as a party defendant in the action, and also, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the inmate.

The period of limitations applicable to the cause of action after it has been dismissed by a court under this section for failure to exhaust administrative remedies is the period fixed by the applicable statute or ninety (90) days following the exhaustion of administrative remedies if the grievance is filed within the applicable period of limitations, whichever is later. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to revive a cause of action that is barred by the applicable period of limitations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 118, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 11, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 118, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 46, § 3, effective July 15, 2010.